Florida, session 2026, HB301.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
464.0123, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
464.0123 Autonomous practice by an advanced practice
registered nurse.—
(3) PRACTICE REQUIREMENTS.—
(a) An advanced practice registered nurse who is
registered under this section may:
1. Engage in autonomous practice only in primary care
practice, including family medicine, general pediatrics, and
general internal medicine, as defined by board rule. If an
advanced practice registered nurse is certified as a psychiatric
mental health advanced practice nurse, he or she may engage in
autonomous practice to provide mental health services, as
defined by board rule.
2. For certified nurse midwives, engage in autonomous
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb301-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 301 2026
practice in the performance of the acts listed in s.
464.012(4)(c).
3. Perform the general functions of an advanced practice
registered nurse under s. 464.012(3) related to primary care.
4. For a patient who requires the services of a health
care facility, as defined in s. 408.032(8):
a. Admit the patient to the facility.
b. Manage the care received by the patient in the
facility.
c. Discharge the patient from the facility, unless
prohibited by federal law or rule.
5. Provide a signature, certification, stamp,
verification, affidavit, or endorsement that is otherwise
required by law to be provided by a physician, except an
advanced practice registered nurse registered under this section
may not issue a physician certification under s. 381.986.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb301-00